New Jersey, session 221, S568.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act, One-time emergency alert means an electronic message sent directly to a personal communication device that alerts law enforcement officers of an emergency event that threatens the health, safety, and welfare of the public. Personal communication device means a commercial wireless device including, but not limited to, a cell phone or laptop that was purchased by a law enforcement officer for personal use and was not issued by the officers employer. b.    A State, county, or municipal law enforcement officer may voluntarily agree to receive one-time emergency alerts on the officers personal communication device.  The information contained in the one-time emergency alert shall be stored on an external computer server and the law enforcement officer shall not have access to the alert information on the officers personal communication device after the one-time emergency alert has expired. c.     The information contained in the one-time emergency alerts pursuant to this section shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to public records and shall not be discoverable or admissible as evidence in any legal action or administrative proceeding. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.